Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2618
Qualifying child; tuition waiver; limitation.

A qualifying child may receive the tuition waiver under section 85-2616 for up to five years if the qualifying child continues to be eligible for participation. The five years of tuition waiver eligibility starts once the qualifying child applies for and receives the tuition waiver for the first time and is available to such qualifying child for the next consecutive five years.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 11.